Florida, session 2026, SB266.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (7) of section 626.854, Florida 14 Statutes, is amended to read: 15 626.854ââPublic adjusterâ defined; prohibitions.âThe 16 Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the 17 public to regulate public insurance adjusters and to prevent the 18 unauthorized practice of law. 19 (7)(a)âAn insured or a claimant may cancel a public 20 adjusterâs contract to adjust a claim without penalty or 21 obligation within 10 days after the date on which the contract 22 is executed. If the contract was entered into based on events 23 that are the subject of a declaration of a state of emergency by 24 the Governor, an insured or a claimant may cancel the public 25 adjusterâs contract to adjust a claim without penalty or 26 obligation within 30 days after the date of loss or 10 days 27 after the date on which the contract is executed, whichever is 28 longer. The public adjusterâs contract must contain the 29 following language in minimum 18-point bold type immediately 30 before the space reserved in the contract for the signature of 31 the insured or claimant: 32 33 âYou, the insured, may cancel this contract for any 34 reason without penalty or obligation to you within 10 35 days after the date of this contract. If this contract 36 was entered into based on events that are the subject 37 of a declaration of a state of emergency by the 38 Governor, you may cancel this contract for any reason 39 without penalty or obligation to you within 30 days 40 after the date of loss or 10 days after the date on 41 which the contract is executed, whichever is longer. 42 You may also cancel the contract without penalty or 43 obligation to you if I, as your public adjuster, fail 44 to provide you and your insurer a copy of a written 45 estimate within 60 days of the execution of the 46 contract, unless the failure to provide the estimate 47 within 60 days is caused by factors beyond my control, 48 in accordance with s. 627.70131(5)(a)2., Florida 49 Statutes. The 60-day cancellation period for failure 50 to provide a written estimate shall cease on the date 51 I have provided you with the written estimate.â 52 53 The notice of cancellation must shall be provided to ...(name of 54 public adjuster)..., submitted in writing and sent by certified 55 mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that 56 provides proof thereof, at the address specified in the 57 contract. 58 (b)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an 59 insured who is a vulnerable adult or who lacks capacity to 60 consent, as those terms are defined in s. 415.102, or the legal 61 representative of such insured persons, may rescind a contract 62 for public adjuster services to adjust a claim at any time 63 without penalty or further obligation. 64 Section 2.âSection 626.8698, Florida Statutes, is amended 65 to read: 66 626.8698âDisciplinary guidelines for public adjusters and 67 public adjuster apprentices.âThe department may deny, suspend, 68 or revoke the license of a public adjuster or public adjuster 69 apprentice, and administer a fine not to exceed $5,000 per act, 70 for any of the following acts: 71 (1)âViolating any provision of this chapter or a rule or 72 order of the department.; 73 (2)âReceiving payment or anything of value as a result of 74 an unfair or deceptive practice.; 75 (3)âReceiving or accepting any fee, kickback, or other 76 thing of value pursuant to any agreement or understanding, oral 77 or otherwise; entering into a split-fee arrangement with another 78 person who is not a public adjuster; or being otherwise paid or 79 accepting payment for services that have not been performed.; 80 (4)âViolating s. 316.066 or s. 817.234.; 81 (5)âSoliciting or otherwise taking advantage of a person 82 who is a vulnerable adult, as defined is s. 415.102, or who is 83 emotional, or otherwise upset as the result of a trauma, 84 accident, or other similar occurrence.; or 85 (6)âViolating any ethical rule of the department. 86 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 626.8796, Florida 87 Statutes, is amended to read: 88 626.8796âPublic adjuster contracts; disclosure statement; 89 fraud statement.â 90 (4)(a)âThe insured may rescind the contract for public 91 adjuster services if the public adjuster has not submitted a 92 written estimate to the insurer within 60 days after executing 93 the contract, unless the failure to provide the written estimate 94 within 60 days is caused by factors beyond the public adjusterâs 95 control. 96 (b)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an 97 insured who is a vulnerable adult or who lacks capacity to 98 consent, as those terms are defined in s. 415.102, or the legal 99 representative of such insured persons, may rescind a contract 100 for public adjuster services at any time without penalty or 101 further obligation. 102 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.